Louisiana, session 2026, SB354.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 27:602(23) is hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 27:602(29) and
(30) and 608(C)(5) and (6) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§602. Definitions
For purposes of this Chapter, the following terms have the following meanings
ascribed to them unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:
* * *
(23) "Sports wager" or "sports bet" means a sum of money or representation
of value risked by a player on an occurrence associated with a sports event for which
the outcome is uncertain. The term includes but is not limited to single-game bets,
teaser bets, parlay bets, over-under bets, moneyline bets, pools, exchange wagering,
in-game wagering, in-play bets, proposition bets, and straight bets.
* * *
Page 1 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-581 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 354
(29) "Proposition bet" or "prop bet" means a side wager on a part of a
sport or athletic event that does not concern the final outcome of the sport or
athletic event.
(30) "Sports micro-bet" means a proposition bet which is wagered live,
while a sport or athletic event is ongoing, and concerns the outcome of a play or
action occurring in the sport or athletic event.
* * *
§608. Limitations on wagering
* * *
C. No sports wagers may be accepted or paid by any operator on any of the
following:
* * *
(5) On any sports micro-bet.
(6) On any proposition bet.
* * *